Hawaii statutes.
§40-40 Receipts and payments. For all
moneys paid into the treasury there shall be prepared a treasury deposit
receipt in the form and in the number of copies determined by the comptroller
as provided in section 40-6. The receipt shall specify the information
required by the comptroller and the director of finance for the proper
accounting of the amount paid into the treasury. The receipt shall be
countersigned by the director of finance, or the director's designee, after
writing upon its face the day of its delivery to the director. The director,
or the director's designee, shall deliver a copy of the receipt to the person
or official paying the money into the treasury, and shall deliver a copy to the
comptroller. The director shall retain the original receipt, charging the
director with the amount specified therein, and crediting the fund or account
named thereon. No receipt shall be considered valid or binding as against the
State, unless so countersigned as in this chapter provided. [L 1898, c 39, §11;
RL 1925, §1448; am L 1927, c 219, §7; RL 1935, §575; RL 1945, §1579; RL 1955,
§34-28; am L 1957, c 152, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1961, c 63, §1;
am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §40-40; am L 1975, c 72, §1; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next